Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3507
Licensed surgical first assistant, defined.

Licensed surgical first assistant means a person licensed to practice surgical assisting under the Surgical First Assistant Practice Act.

Laws 2016, LB721, § 7.